Utah statutes.
65A-1-1.   Definitions.

As used in this title:

(1)  "Division" means the Division of Forestry, Fire, and State Lands.

(2)  "Multiple use" means the management of various surface and subsurface resources in a manner that will best meet the present and future needs of the people of this state.

(3)  "Public trust assets" means those lands and resources, including sovereign lands, administered by the division.

(4)  "Sovereign lands" means those lands lying below the ordinary high water mark of navigable bodies of water at the date of statehood and owned by the state by virtue of its sovereignty.

(5)  "State lands" means all lands administered by the division.

(6)  "Sustained yield" means the achievement and maintenance of high level annual or periodic output of the various renewable resources of land without impairment of the productivity of the land.

(7)  "Wildland" means an area where:

(a)  development is essentially non-existent, except for roads, railroads, powerlines, or similar transportation facilities; and

(b)  structures, if any, are widely scattered.

(8)  "Wildland fire" means a fire that consumes:

(a)  wildland; or

(b)  wildland-urban interface, as defined in Section 65A-8a-102.



Amended by Chapter 413, 2013 General Session

